Hawaii statutes.
§634-24 Service outside the State or by
registered mail. [(a)] In any case in which, under section 634-23,
provision is made for service of summons as provided by this section, personal
service shall be made upon the defendant wherever found or the defendant shall
be served by registered or certified mail with request for a return receipt and
marked deliver to addressee only, as ordered by the court. A certified copy of
the order, the summons and the complaint shall be served, and the service shall
be evidenced by an affidavit showing that the required papers were sent by
registered or certified mail as aforesaid, and by the receipt signed by the
defendant and filed with the affidavit, or in the case of personal service by
the return of the serving officer or the affidavit of any other person
authorized to serve process in the place where the defendant is found or
appointed by the court to make the service.

[(b)] The affidavit required by this section
shall set forth facts based upon the personal knowledge of the affiant
concerning the methods, means, and attempts made to satisfy the requirements of
this section and any other pertinent facts. [CC 1859, §1104; am L 1903, c 5,
§1; RL 1925, §2344; am L 1929, c 43, §2; RL 1935, §4080; RL 1945, §10062; RL 1955,
§230-32; HRS §634-60; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(g); ren HRS §634-24; am L 1976, c
183, §2; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

See 10 H. 668, 673 (1897); 35 H. 689, 710 (1940); 46 H. 1,
373 P.2d 710 (1962); 50 H. 484, 443 P.2d 155 (1968).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next